Massachusetts, session 194th, H47.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 10 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 78 the
following section:-
Section 79. (a) There shall be within the office of the state treasurer an office of
economic empowerment. The office of economic empowerment shall perform such functions as
the treasurer may determine in relation to the provision of equitable access to opportunities and
resources through equity-centered programs, policies, and partnerships to promote economic
mobility and financial independence to residents across the commonwealth.
(b) The office shall be under the supervision and control of the executive director. The
executive director shall be the executive and administrative head of the office and shall be
responsible for administering and enforcing the laws and regulations relative to the office and to
any administrative unit of the office thereof. The duties given to the executive director in this act
of 2

shall be exercised and discharged subject to the direction, control, and supervision of the state
treasurer.
(c) The executive director may, subject to appropriation, appoint and remove such
employees as they deem necessary to perform the duties of their office, and may determine their
salaries and duties; provided, however, that the total amount of all such salaries shall not exceed
the sum appropriated by the general court.
of 2